Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1621
Plan sponsor; contributions; when.

If the fund established pursuant to section 13-1619 is not adequate to fully cover all disbursements under the self-funded portion of the employee benefit plan, the plan sponsor shall contribute funds from other sources so that the employee benefit plan continues to comply with the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 21.